Nebraska, session 109, LB697.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB697 LB697
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-2849, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2849 The board shall be composed of eight five members, including
five four actively practicing pharmacists, at least one of whom practices
within the confines of a hospital, one pharmacy technician, and two one
public members member who are is interested in the health of the people
of Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Section 38-2867.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2867.01 (1) Any person authorized to compound shall compound in
compliance with the standards of chapters 795 and 797 of The United
States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary, as such chapters existed
on January 1, 2023, and shall compound (a) as the result of a
practitioner's medical order or initiative occurring in the course of
practice based upon the relationship between the practitioner, patient,
and pharmacist, (b) for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research,
teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale or dispensing, or (c) for
office use only and not for resale by an outsourcing facility operating
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 353b or section 71-470.
(2) Compounding in a hospital pharmacy may occur for any hospital
which is part of the same health care system under common ownership or
which is a member of or an affiliated member of a formal network or
partnership agreement.
(3)(a) Any authorized person may reconstitute a commercially
available drug product in accordance with directions contained in
approved labeling provided by the product's manufacturer and other
manufacturer directions consistent with labeling.
(b) Any authorized person using beyond-use dating must follow the
approved product manufacturer's labeling or the standards of The United
States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary if the product
manufacturer's labeling does not specify beyond-use dating.
-2-

LB697 LB697
2025 2025
(c) Any authorized person engaged in activities listed in this
subsection is not engaged in compounding, except that any variance from
the approved product manufacturer's labeling will result in the person
being engaged in compounding.
(4) Any authorized person splitting a scored tablet along scored
lines or adding flavoring to a commercially available drug product is not
engaged in compounding.
(5) No person shall compound:
(a) A drug that has been identified by the federal Food and Drug
Administration as withdrawn or removed from the market because the drug
was found to be unsafe or ineffective;
(b) A drug that is essentially a copy of an approved drug unless
there is a drug shortage as determined by the board or unless a patient
has an allergic reaction to the approved drug; or
(c) A drug that has been identified by the federal Food and Drug
Administration or the board as a product which may not be compounded.
Sec. 3. Section 38-2884, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2884 Under a delegated dispensing permit for a public health
clinic, approved formulary drugs and devices may be dispensed by a public
health clinic worker or a health care professional licensed in Nebraska
to practice medicine and surgery or licensed in Nebraska as a registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, or physician assistant without the
onsite services of a pharmacist if:
(1) The initial dispensing of all prescriptions for approved
formulary drugs and devices is conducted by a health care professional
licensed in Nebraska to practice medicine and surgery or pharmacy or
licensed in Nebraska as a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or
physician assistant;
(2) The drug or device is dispensed pursuant to a prescription
written onsite by a practitioner or by a practitioner licensed in
-3-

LB697 LB697
2025 2025
Nebraska working in affiliation with a public health clinic pursuant to a
delegated dispensing permit;
(3) The only prescriptions to be refilled under the delegated
dispensing permit are prescriptions for contraceptives;
(4) Prescriptions are accompanied by patient instructions and
written information approved by the director;
(5) The dispensing of authorized refills of contraceptives is done
by a licensed health care professional listed in subdivision (1) of this
section or by a public health clinic worker;
(6) All drugs or devices are prepackaged by the manufacturer or at a
public health clinic by a pharmacist into the quantity to be prescribed
and dispensed at the public health clinic;
(7) All drugs and devices stored, received, or dispensed under the
authority of public health clinics are properly labeled at all times. For
purposes of this subdivision, properly labeled means that the label
affixed to the container prior to dispensing contains the following
information:
(a) The name of the manufacturer;
(b) The lot number and expiration date from the manufacturer or, if
repackaged by a pharmacist, the lot number and calculated expiration
date;
(c) Directions for patient use;
(d) The quantity of drug in the container;
(e) The name, strength, and dosage form of the drug; and
(f) Auxiliary labels as needed for proper adherence to any
prescription;
(8) The following additional information is added to the label of
each container when the drug or device is dispensed:
(a) The patient's name;
(b) The name of the prescribing health care professional;
(c) The prescription number;
-4-

LB697 LB697
2025 2025
(d) The date dispensed; and
(e) The name and address of the public health clinic;
(9) The only drugs and devices allowed to be dispensed or stored by
public health clinics appear on the formulary approved pursuant to
section 38-2881; and
(10) At any time that dispensing is occurring from a public health
clinic, the delegating pharmacist for the public health clinic or on-call
pharmacist in Nebraska is available, either in person or by telephone, to
answer questions from clients, staff, public health clinic workers, or
volunteers. This availability shall be confirmed and documented at the
beginning of each day that dispensing will occur. The delegating
pharmacist or on-call pharmacist shall inform the public health clinic if
he or she will not be available during the time that his or her
availability is required. If a pharmacist is unavailable, no dispensing
shall occur.
Sec. 4. Original sections 38-2849 and 38-2884, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 38-2867.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-